Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1907
Person cannot abandon a vehicle.

No person shall cause any vehicle to be an abandoned vehicle as described in subdivision (1)(a), (b), (c), or (d) or (2)(a), (b), or (c) of section 60-1901.

Laws 1971, LB 295, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 90, § 8;

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 43.